hr-HR: Fleksibilnost britvice: Fiksna; Fleksibilna; Ostalo
it: Flessibilità del rasoio: Fisso; Flessibile; Altro
sv: Rakapparat flexibilitet: Fast; Flexibel; Övrigt
es: Flexibilidad de la afeitadora: Fijo; Flexible; Otros
fi: Partakoneen joustavuus: Pysyvä; Joustava; Muu
en: Razor flexibility: Fixed; Flexible; Other
th: ความยืดหยุ่นของใบมีดโกน: แบบแช่น้ำยารักษาสภาพ; ขอบยืดหยุ่น; อื่นๆ
da: Barberbladsfleksibilitet: Fast; Fleksibel; Andet
pl: Elastyczność golarki: Stałe; Elastyczne; Inne
bg-BG: Гъвкавост на бръснача: Фиксирано; Гъвкаво; Други
vi: Dao cạo linh hoạt: Cố định; Mềm dẻo; Khác
hu: Borotva rugalmassága: Rögzített; Flexibilis; Egyéb
zh-CN: 剃刀灵活性: 固定; 灵活式; 其他
zh-TW: 刮鬍刀靈活性: 固定; 柔韌; 其他
tr: Jilet esnekliği: Sabit; Esnek; Diğer
el: Ευελιξία ξυραφιού: Σταθερή; Εύκαμπτο; Άλλο
ko: 면도기 유연성: 고정; 유연함; 기타
cs: Pohyblivost hlavy strojku: Pevný; Pružná; Jiné
nl: Flexibiliteit scheermesje: Vast; Flexibel; Andere
sl-SI: Prilagodljivost brivnika: Fiksna; Prilagodljivo; Drugo
fr: Flexibilité du rasoir: Fixé; Flexible; Autre
pt-PT: Flexibilidade da lâmina: Fixo; Flexível; Outro
ro-RO: Flexibilitatea aparatului de ras: Fix; Flexibil; Altele
sk-SK: Pružnosť žiletky: Pevný; Flexibilný; Iné
ja: 刃のタイプ: 固定; フレキシブル; その他
lt-LT: Skustuvo lankstumas: Fiksuotas; Lankstus; Kita
nb: Barberhøvelens fleksibilitet: Fast; Fleksibel; Annet
de: Flexibilität des Rasierers: Befestigt; Flexibel; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Flexibilidade da lâmina: Fixo; Flexível; Outro
ru: Гибкость бритвы: Фиксированный; Гибкий; Другой